Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 6. Sand and Gravel

§ 39-14-601.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Arm’s-length market or sales price” means the transaction price determined in connection with a bona fide arm’s length sale;

“Bona fide arm’s-length sale” means a transaction in cash or terms equivalent to cash for specified property rights after reasonable exposure in a competitive market between a willing, well informed and prudent buyer and seller with adverse economic interests and assuming neither party is acting under undue compulsion or duress;

“Department review” means, but is not limited to, corrections of clerical errors or reconciliations of tax reports with reports required by other state or federal agencies;

“Mine product valuation amendment” means a valuation adjustment determination made by the department including special directives;

“Mining or production” means drilling, blasting, loading, roadwork, overburden removal, pre-mouth of the mine reclamation, transportation from the point of severance to the mouth of the mine, and maintenance of facilities and equipment directly relating to any of the functions stated in this paragraph;

“Mouth of the mine” means the point at which a mineral is brought to the surface of the ground and is taken out of the pit, shaft or portal. For a surface mine, this point shall be the top of the ramp where the road or conveying system leaves the pit. For an in situ mine, the point shall be the wellhead;

“Processing” means crushing, sizing, milling, washing, drying, refining, upgrading, beneficiation, sampling, testing, treating, heating, separating, tailings or reject material disposal, compressing, storing, loading for shipment, transportation from the mouth of the mine to the loadout, transportation to market to the extent included in the price and provided by the producer, processing plant site and post-mouth of mine reclamation, maintenance of facilities and equipment relating to any of the functions stated in this paragraph, and any other function after severance that changes the physical or chemical characteristics or enhances the marketability of the mineral;

“Purchaser” means the first purchaser who acquires the produced valuable sand or gravel deposit from the taxpayer for value;

“Severance tax” means an excise tax imposed on the present and continuing privilege of removing, extracting, severing or producing any mineral in this state;

Beginning January 1, 1989, “taxable value” means one hundred percent (100%) of the fair market value of the gross product of minerals and mine products;

“Unreported production” means production volume for which no tax report was filed for the reporting period by the taxpayer or his agent;

“Value of the gross product” means fair market value as prescribed by W.S. 39-11-101(a)(vi), less any deductions and exemption allowed by Wyoming law or rules.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 10, § 1; ch. 59, § 1.

Cited

in

BP America Prod. Co. v. Department of Revenue, 2006 WY 27, 130 P.3d 438,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. Mar. 14, 2006).

§ 39-14-602.
Administration; confidentiality.

The department shall annually value and assess the gross product of all mines and mining claims at its fair market value for taxation.

The department shall annually value the gross product for the preceding calendar year, in appropriate unit measures of all mines and mining claims from which valuable deposits are produced.

Annually, on or before June 1, or as soon thereafter as the fair market value is determined, the department shall certify the valuation determined by the department to the county assessor of the county in which the property is located, to be entered upon the assessment rolls of the county.

All taxpayer returns and return information shall be confidential and, except as authorized below, no current or former official, officer, employee or agent of the state of Wyoming or any political subdivision thereof shall disclose any such information obtained by him in connection with his service as an officer or employee.

As used in this section, taxpayer returns and return information shall include, but not be limited to, all statements, reports, summaries and all other data and documents under audit or provided by the taxpayer in accordance with the provisions of W.S. 39-14-607(a) and related provision.

Without written authorization from the taxpayer, no current or former official, officer, employee or agent of the state of Wyoming or any political subdivision thereof shall release taxpayer returns and return information pertaining to taxes imposed by this article, except:

Information may be released to the governor or his designee, members of the board, to employees of the department of audit, the department of revenue, the consensus revenue estimating group and to the attorney general;

Upon prior notice to the taxpayer, information may be released by the department, upon written application, to any other governmental entity if the governmental entity shows sufficient reason to obtain the information for official business;

Information is admissible in court or administrative proceedings related to mineral taxes or government royalties.

Any person receiving information pursuant to paragraph (f)(ii) of this section shall sign an agreement with the department to keep the information confidential.

Units of production reported by the taxpayer and the taxpayer’s taxable value are not confidential and may be released without qualification.

Any person who negligently violates subsections (d) through (h) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00). Any person who intentionally violates subsections (d) through (h) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), but not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) and imprisoned for not more than one (1) year.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 68, § 1.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2000, ch. 68, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

Reporting of oil production should be done at wellhead. —

Wyoming Department of Revenue properly reallocated a production company's oil production from a production unit for 1980 through 1988 between one county and intervenor county because former Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-2-201(e) always contemplated that reporting of oil production should be done at the wellhead, and the enactment of former Wyo. Stat. Ann § 39-2-213 (currently Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-14-207(a)(iii)) did not constitute a ‘change,’ but only a restatement of what general practice had always been contemplated, the practice that was generally in place, and the practice that should generally continue. BP Am. Prod. Co. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2006 WY 27, 130 P.3d 438,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2006).

Cited

in

Exxon Corp. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 987 P.2d 158,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 39-14-603.
Imposition.

Taxable event. The following shall apply:

There is levied a severance tax on the value of the gross product for the privilege of severing or extracting sand and gravel in the state. The severance tax imposed by this article may be in addition to other taxes, including but not limited to the ad valorem taxes imposed by W.S.

39-13-104

.

Basis of tax (valuation). The following shall apply:

Sand and gravel shall be valued for taxation as provided in this subsection. For purposes of this subsection, the term “sand and gravel” includes aggregates used in construction. Based upon the information received or procured pursuant to W.S. 39-14-607(a)(i) or 39-14-608(a)(i), the department shall annually value the gross product for the preceding calendar year, in appropriate unit measures of all mines and mining claims from which valuable deposits are produced, at the fair market value of the product at the mouth of the pit or quarry where produced, after the mining or production process is completed;

In the event the sand and gravel are sold at the mouth of the pit or quarry without further movement or processing, the fair market value shall be the price established by bona fide arms-length sale less exempt royalty;

In the event the sand and gravel are not sold at the mouth of the pit or quarry by a bona fide arms-length sale, or, except as otherwise provided, if the product of the pit or quarry is used without sale, the department shall determine the fair market value of sand and gravel in accordance with paragraph (iv) or (v) of this subsection;

For sand and gravel sold away from the mouth of the mine pursuant to a bona fide arms-length sale the department shall calculate the fair market value by multiplying the sales value of the sand and gravel less exempt royalties by twenty-five hundredths (0.25);

For sand and gravel used without sale or not sold pursuant to a bona fide arms-length agreement the fair market value shall be the fair market value of sand and gravel which is comparable in quality, quantity, terms and conditions under which the sand and gravel is being used or sold;

The value of the gross product shall be the fair market value of the product at the mouth of the mine where produced, after the mining or production process is completed;

Except as otherwise provided, the mining or production process is deemed completed when the mineral product reaches the mouth of the mine. In no event shall the value of the mineral product include any processing functions or operations regardless of where the processing is performed;

Except as otherwise provided, if the product as provided in paragraph (vii) of this subsection is sold at the mouth of the mine, the fair market value shall be deemed to be the price established by bona fide arms-length sale.

Taxpayer. The following shall apply:

In the case of the gross product of all mines and mining claims produced under lease, the lessor is liable for the of ad valorem taxes on the product removed only to the extent of the lessor’s retained interest under the lease, whether royalty or otherwise, and the lessee or his assignee is liable for all other property taxes due on production under the lease;

Any taxpayer paying the taxes imposed by this article on any valuable deposit may deduct the severance taxes paid from any amounts due or to become due to the interest owners of such valuable deposit in proportion to the interest ownership;

Any person extracting valuable products subject to this article and any person owning an interest in the valuable products to the extent of their interest ownership are liable for the payment of the severance taxes imposed by this article together with any penalties and interest.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 10, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no paragraph (a)(ii) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 39-14-604.
Tax rate.

The total severance tax rate for sand and gravel shall be two percent (2%). The tax shall be distributed as provided in W.S.

39-14-611

.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-14-605.
Exemptions.

There are no specific applicable provisions for exemptions for this chapter.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-14-606.
Licenses; permits.

There are no specific applicable provisions for licenses and permits for this chapter.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-14-607.
Compliance; collection procedures.

Returns and reports. The following shall apply:

Annually, on or before February 25 of the year following the year of production any person whose property is subject to W.S. 39-14-602(a) shall sign under oath and submit a statement listing the information relative to the property and affairs of the company as the department may require to assess the property;

All information and reports shall be notarized and signed by a person who has legal authority to bind the taxpayer;

For mines and mining claims, the department may presume that the property is located in the county in which production is reported by the taxpayer. The department shall not direct any county to provide relief for taxes paid on taxable valuation which was erroneously reported and certified to the wrong county unless the taxpayer files or is directed to file amended returns within two (2) years of the date of the original certification of the production. Unless there is evidence of bad faith or willful disregard of production circumstances, no taxpayer shall be required to pay taxes on production which was erroneously reported and certified to the wrong county if relief for taxes paid is not allowed under this provision;

Except as provided in paragraph (v) of this subsection, each taxpayer liable for severance taxes under W.S.

39-14-603

shall report monthly to the department. The monthly tax reports are due on or before the twenty-fifth day of the second month following the month of production. Reports shall be filed on forms prescribed by the department. The department may allow extensions for filing returns by regulation;

If a taxpayer’s liability for severance tax imposed under this article is less than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00) for the preceding calendar year, monthly reporting requirements are waived and the taxpayer shall report annually. The annual report is due on February 25 of the year following the year in which production occurred. If a taxpayer who reports annually accumulates an annual liability exceeding thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00), that taxpayer shall commence reporting monthly as provided in paragraph (iv) of this subsection during the production year following the year in which the accumulated tax liability exceeded thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00). It is the taxpayer’s responsibility to notify the department concerning the change from annual to monthly reporting requirements or from monthly to annual reporting;

For mines and mining claims, the taxpayer shall report the location of the production to the county and tax district in which the mine or mining claim is located, based upon the actual taxable production produced by the mine in each county or tax district. Other reasonable methods of reporting the location of production may be approved by the department upon written request of the taxpayer or taxing jurisdiction.

Payment. The following shall apply:

Annually, on or before October 10 the county treasurer shall send a written statement in sealed envelopes of total tax due, itemized as to property description, assessed value and mill levies, to each taxpayer at his last known address. Failure to send notice, or to demand payment of taxes, does not invalidate any taxes due;

Ad valorem taxes provided by this act are due and payable:

For the 2019 tax year and all preceding tax years, at the office of the county treasurer of the county in which the taxes are levied. Fifty percent (50%) of the taxes are due on and after September 1 and payable on and after November 10 in each year and the remaining fifty percent (50%) of the taxes are due on and after March 1 and payable on and after May 10 of the succeeding calendar year except as hereafter provided. If the entire tax is paid on or before December 31, no interest or penalty is chargeable;

Effective January 1, 2020 for tax year 2020 and each year thereafter, ad valorem taxes are due as provided in W.S.

39-13-113

.

Except as provided in paragraph (iv) of this subsection, each taxpayer liable for a severance tax under W.S. 39-14-603(a) shall pay monthly tax payments to the department. The payment shall be determined by the taxpayer based on the value of the gross product produced and saved during the second preceding month, and tax computed on value at rates prescribed in this article. The monthly tax payments are due on or before the twenty-fifth day of the second month following the month of production. If the report the taxpayer is required to file shows tax due, the taxpayer shall pay the tax due when the report is filed. The department may allow extensions for paying taxes by regulation. The department may, if an extension is granted, request the payment of the reasonable estimate of ninety percent (90%) of the tax by the statutory due date, with the remaining tax remitted with the extended return;

If a taxpayer’s liability for severance tax imposed under this article is less than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00) for the preceding calendar year, monthly payment requirements are waived and the taxpayer shall pay the tax annually. The annual payment is due on February 25 of the year following the year in which production occurred. If a taxpayer who pays annually accumulates an annual liability exceeding thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00), that taxpayer shall commence remitting tax payments as provided in paragraph (iii) of this subsection during the production year following the year in which the accumulated tax liability exceeded thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00). It is the taxpayer’s responsibility to notify the department concerning the change from annual to monthly payment requirements or from monthly to annual payment.

Timelines. Except as specifically provided, there are no general applicable provisions for timelines for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2020 ch. 142, § 2, effective March 24, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

redesignated former (b)(ii) as the introductory language of (b)(ii) and (b)(ii)(A); in present (b)(ii)(A), added “For the 2019 tax year and all preceding tax years,” at the beginning; and added (b)(ii)(B) and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2020, ch. 142, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2020.

Statute not to be applied retroactively. —

Where the Wyoming Department of Revenue (DOR) changed the allocation of a company's oil production from a production unit for 1980 through 1988 between one county and intervenor county, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 39-13-103(b)(xv), 39-14-107(a)(iii), 39-14-207(a)(iv), 39-14-307(a)(iii), 39-14-407(a)(iii), 39-14-507(a)(iii), 39-14-607(a)(iii), and 39-14-707(a)(iii) did not apply retroactively because there was substantial evidence that the events triggering the dispute in this case occurred prior to the enactment of former Wyo. Stat. § 39-2-201(j) in that the production, the discovery of the mis-allocation and the notice of the mis-allocation all occurred prior to the enactment and effective date of § 39-2-201(j). BP Am. Prod. Co. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2006 WY 27, 130 P.3d 438,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2006).

§ 39-14-608.
Enforcement.

General. The following shall apply:

If the statement provided by W.S. 39-14-607(a)(i) is not filed, the department shall value the property from the best information available. The department may use information other than contained in the statement provided by W.S. 39-14-607(a)(i) to determine the fair market value of the property provided by W.S. 39-14-602(a);

When a taxpayer producing valuable deposits fails to pay the taxes imposed by this article when due, the purchaser of the produced valuable deposit shall withhold and remit to the department the taxpayer’s subsequently accruing taxes on the produced valuable deposit acquired by the purchaser. This provision is subject to the following conditions:

The department shall notify the purchaser and taxpayer in writing on or before the first day of the production month for which subsequent taxes are due that the purchaser shall begin remitting taxes to the department as provided in W.S. 39-14-607(b)(iii);

The department shall notify the purchaser in writing of the proper rates for calculating taxes due and the percentage of the produced valuable deposit subject to taxation by this article;

The amount of tax paid by a purchaser to the department, as required by this subsection, shall offset and satisfy all claims for payments for the purchase of produced valuable deposits to the extent of the tax payment;

This paragraph shall not apply under circumstances where the purchaser is required to continue payments due to legal proceedings;

This paragraph shall not apply until after the purchaser has been notified in writing that subsequent accruing taxes will be payable by the purchaser.

Severance taxes due together with interest, penalties and costs shall be collectible by the department by appropriate judicial proceedings.

Audits. The following shall apply:

The department may employ examiners and obtain other technical services, to investigate and examine the books and records of any person paying taxes imposed under W.S.

39-13-101

through

39-13-111

. The department shall notify the county assessor of any change in valuation as determined by audits, examinations or investigations establishing:

Taxable volumes or values were not accurately reported;

Clerical errors were made in determining taxable volumes or values;

Taxable volumes or values for the year that production occurred were not calculated in compliance with Wyoming statutes or rules governing the determinations; or

Additional payment for production was received and not reported whether such payment was received in the year of production or in subsequent years.

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 84, § 102.

The department is authorized to rely on final audit findings, taxpayer amended returns or department review, and to certify mine product valuation amendments to the county assessor of the county in which the property is located, to be entered upon the assessment rolls of the county and taxes computed and collected thereon subject to appeal under W.S. 39-14-609(b)(ii), provided that the return is filed within three (3) years from the date the production should have been reported pursuant to W.S. 39-14-607(a)(i), and that the audit or review commenced within the time period as required by paragraph (vii) of this subsection. Commencement of an audit, completion of an audit, and final audit findings and final determination by the department being issued to the taxpayer shall not preclude the taxpayer from filing amended returns within the time period specified herein, and the amended return may be audited within the time period stated in paragraph (vii) of this subsection;

The department is authorized to rely on final audit findings, taxpayer amended returns or department review, and to assess deficient severance tax payments, interest and penalty, if any, for the same periods governing mine product valuation amendments pursuant to paragraphs (ii) and (iii) of this subsection;

All audits or department reviews, as applicable, pursuant to paragraphs (ii), (iii) and (iv) of this subsection are subject to the following conditions:

Audits are commenced when the taxpayer receives written notice of the intended action;

Prior to entering the premises of a taxpayer or third party, the taxpayer or third party shall be provided at least fourteen (14) days written notice;

Audits are completed when the final findings are issued to the taxpayer by the department of audit;

Unless otherwise agreed to in writing, audits shall be completed and the final audit findings issued to the taxpayer not later than the end of the month two (2) years after the audit is commenced and not sooner than one (1) year following the reporting date for ad valorem taxes;

Any assessment or levy, including the assessment of a penalty and interest, if any, resulting from final audit findings or department review shall be issued within one (1) year following the completion of the audit or review;

Upon receipt of department review findings, the taxpayer shall have sixty (60) days in which to submit a response.

Where there is evidence of gross negligence by the taxpayer in reporting and valuing production, an audit may examine prior years and issue assessments where gross negligence occurred. This section shall not apply to mine product valuation amendments to add the value of unreported production;

Audits provided by this article shall commence within three (3) years and six (6) months immediately following the reporting date for ad valorem taxes and taxpayers shall keep accurate books and records of all production subject to taxes imposed by this article and determinations of taxable value as prescribed by W.S. 39-14-603(b) for a period of seven (7) years and make them available to department examiners for audit purposes. Amended returns filed with the department during the conduct of an audit prior to the issuance of the final audit findings may be made available by the taxpayer to the audit examiners. If the examination discloses evidence of gross negligence by the taxpayer in reporting and paying the tax, the department may examine all pertinent records for any reporting period without regard to the limitations set forth in paragraphs (vii) and (viii) of this subsection;

In order to examine relevant books or records of a taxpayer subject to a tax imposed by this article or to secure any information related to enforcement of this article, authorized representatives of the department may at any time during normal business hours enter premises of a taxpayer liable for a tax imposed by this article or the premises of any third party having information regarding that taxpayer’s liability. Prior to entering the premises of a taxpayer or third party, the department shall provide fourteen (14) days written notice to the taxpayer and third party;

The state may employ auditors and obtain other technical assistance necessary to determine if the tax imposed by this article has been properly reported and paid.

Interest. The following shall apply:

The taxpayer is entitled to receive an offsetting credit for any overpaid gross product or severance tax identified by an audit that is within the scope of the audit period, without regard to the limitation period for requesting refunds. In calculating interest regarding severance tax, the department shall first compute a net deficiency amount after subtracting any offsetting credit and then calculate any interest due. In calculating interest regarding ad valorem tax, the county treasurer shall first compute a net deficiency amount after subtracting any offsetting credit and then calculate any interest due. The board of county commissioners shall be bound by any decision made by the department of revenue in the course of an audit conducted under subsection (b) of this section concerning the time period during which interest shall accrue and be due and payable;

Taxes are delinquent pursuant to paragraphs (iii) and (iv) of this subsection when a taxpayer or his agent knew or reasonably should have known that the total tax liability was not paid when due;

Except for any delinquent taxes determined to be due and owing as a result of an audit conducted under subsection (b) of this section, the balance of any ad valorem tax not paid as provided by W.S. 39-14-607(b)(ii) is delinquent after the day on which it is payable and shall bear interest at eighteen percent (18%) per annum. Effective January 15, 2015, for delinquent taxes determined to be due and owing as a result of an audit conducted under subsection (b) of this section, the balance of any ad valorem tax not paid as provided by W.S. 39-14-607(b) shall be delinquent following the day on which it is payable and shall bear interest at the rate set forth in paragraph (iv) of this subsection until paid or collected;

Effective January 1, 2015, interest at an annual rate equal to the average prime interest rate as determined by the state treasurer during the preceding fiscal year plus four percent (4%) shall be added to all delinquent severance taxes and ad valorem taxes determined to be due and owing as a result of an audit conducted under subsection (b) of this section on any mineral produced on or after January 1, 2015. To determine the average prime interest rate, the state treasurer shall average the prime interest rate for at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the thirty (30) largest banks in the United States. The interest rate on delinquent severance taxes and ad valorem taxes shall be adjusted on January 1 of each year following the year in which the taxes first became delinquent. In no instance shall the delinquent tax rate be less than twelve percent (12%) nor greater than eighteen percent (18%) from any mineral produced on or after January 1, 2015. The interest rate on any delinquent severance and ad valorem tax from any mineral produced before January 1, 2015, shall be as provided by the statutes in effect at the time the mineral was produced.

Penalties. The following shall apply:

The taxpayer is entitled to receive an offsetting credit for any overpaid gross product or severance tax identified by an audit that is within the scope of the audit period, without regard to the limitation period for requesting refunds. In calculating penalty, the department or board of county commissioners shall first compute a net deficiency amount after subtracting any offsetting credit and then calculate any penalty due;

If any person fails to file the report required by W.S.

39-14-607

(a)(i) by the due date or any extension thereof, the department may impose a penalty equal to a total of one percent (1%) of the taxable value of the production from the well, mine or mining claim but not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) for each calendar month or portion thereof that the report or information is late. If any person fails to file reports and other information required by rule of the department of revenue other than those required by W.S.

39-14-607

(a)(iv) or 39-14-607(a)(i), the department may impose a penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000.00). The department may waive penalties under this paragraph for good cause. Penalties imposed under this paragraph may be appealed to the state board of equalization;

If any person fails to make or file a return and remit the tax as required by W.S. 39-14-607 the department shall impose a penalty of five percent (5%) of the taxes due for each thirty (30) day period, or fraction thereof, elapsing between the due date of the return and the date filed, unless the person for good cause obtains from the department an extension of time for filing prior to the due date for filing. In no event shall the total penalty imposed by this subsection exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the tax due. The department, for good cause, may waive a penalty imposed for failure to file a return for any one (1) month in a calendar year, provided that:

The return was filed within five (5) business days following the due date, including an approved extension period; and

The taxpayer requests the waiver in writing within fifteen (15) days after the return was filed, setting forth the reasons for the late filing.

If any part of a tax deficiency is due to negligence or intentional disregard of rules and regulations, there shall be added a penalty of five percent (5%) of the amount of the deficiency plus interest as provided by paragraph (c)(iv) of this section. The taxes, penalty and interest shall be paid by the taxpayer within ten (10) days after receipt of notice and demand by the department;

The department may credit or waive penalties imposed by paragraphs (iii) and (iv) of this subsection as part of a settlement or for any other good cause.

Liens. The following shall apply:

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 50, § 2.

All taxes, fees, penalties and interest imposed under this article are an automatic and continuing lien in favor of the state of Wyoming. The lien is on all property in the state of Wyoming, real, tangible and intangible, including all after acquired property rights, future production and rights to property, of any person severing minerals in this state and who is liable under Wyoming law for the collection, payment or remittance of the severance tax and corresponding penalty or interest as of the date such taxes, fees, penalties or interest is due, and remains a lien until paid;

A lien under this subsection is also a lien on all interests in the mineral estate from which the production was severed, and on all future production of the same mineral from the same leasehold, regardless of any change of ownership or change in the person extracting the mineral;

Any lien arising under this subsection is superior and paramount to all other liens, claims, mortgages or any other encumbrance of any kind except a lien, claim, mortgage or other encumbrance of record held by a bona fide creditor and properly perfected, filed or recorded under Wyoming law prior to the filing of a lien as provided by paragraph (viii) of this subsection;

The department may file a notice of lien at any time at its discretion, except no lien shall be enforced until the right of the taxpayer to file and properly perfect an appeal concerning the tax delinquent property before the state board of equalization has expired. A properly perfected appeal on the tax delinquent property before the state board of equalization or any subsequent properly perfected appeal on the same property to a district court or the supreme court shall stay enforcement of a lien filed by the department until such appeal has been exhausted or concluded;

In order to perfect a tax lien under this subsection, the department of revenue shall file a notice of the tax lien with the secretary of state. The notice of the tax lien shall contain:

The name and last known address of the person or persons against whose property the lien is filed including, but not limited to, the person severing the mineral;

The name and address of the department of revenue as the holder of the lien and the name of the contact person within the department;

The amount of the tax, fees, penalties and interest owed the state of Wyoming;

A statement that the amount of the unpaid tax, fees, penalties or interest is a lien on all property, real, tangible or intangible, including all after acquired property and rights to the property belonging to the person who severed the mineral and located within the state of Wyoming, as well as all interest in the mineral estate from which the production was severed and any future production from the same mineral leasehold.

No other action beyond that described in paragraph (viii) of this subsection shall be required to perfect a tax lien;

The filing of the notice of the tax lien as described in paragraph (viii) of this subsection shall constitute record notice of the tax lien;

One (1) notice of the tax lien shall be deemed sufficient to cover all taxes, together with interest, fees and penalty of the same nature which may accrue after the filing of the notice;

Any tax lien created under this subsection and duly filed with the secretary of state shall survive the death or incapacitation of any person, and shall survive any other destruction or attempted destruction of any interest in property owned by any person liable under Wyoming law for the collection, payment or remittance of taxes, fees, penalties or interest to the state;

In the event of foreclosure, the department of revenue shall be entitled to recover the costs of filing the lien, foreclosing on the lien and reasonable attorney’s fees;

All notice of tax liens shall be released within sixty (60) days after taxes, penalties and interest due are paid or collected;

Notwithstanding that the lien is a lien on all interests in the mineral estate from which the production was severed and on all future production from the same leasehold, the department may for good cause shown, release the lien on all property in this state, real, tangible and intangible, and settle delinquent taxes, interest and penalties to be collected against future production from that leasehold;

The secretary of state is authorized and directed to maintain copies of all tax liens filed by the department of revenue pursuant to this chapter, and to maintain a data base of such tax liens and to provide copies to any person pursuant to the duties of the secretary of state as set forth in W.S.

9-1-301

et seq. All tax liens on file with any county in this state and in good standing on the effective date of this paragraph shall remain effective and in good standing. Within sixty (60) days of the effective date of this paragraph, the director of the department of revenue shall transmit to the secretary of state for filing copies of all tax liens that the director seeks to have in continuing effect. Upon the filing of a copy of the tax lien with the secretary of state, the tax lien shall continue to be fully effective until released by the department of revenue.

Tax sales. There are no specific applicable provisions for tax sales for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 150, § 3; 2001, ch. 43, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 49, § 1; ch. 50, §§ 1, 2; 2005, ch. 4, § 1; 2009, ch. 150, § 1; 2012, ch. 84, § 102; 2014 ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2016 ch. 16, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, made changes in the auditing period, adding the last sentence in (b)(iii); adding “and not sooner than one (1) year following the reporting date for ad valorem taxes” in (b)(v)(D); and in (b)(vii) substituting “date for ad valorem taxes” for “period,” and adding the second sentence; and making stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment,

in (b)(iii), in the first sentence, deleted “or was” following “should have been” and deleted “whichever is later” preceding “and that the audit.”

Laws 2009, ch. 150, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.
Approved March 5, 2009.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, repealed former (b)(ii), which read: “Effective until March 1, 1994, the department is authorized to rely on final audit findings under W.S.

9-2-2003

, taxpayer amended returns or department review, and to certify mine product valuation amendments for production in calendar year 1985 and thereafter, to the county assessor of the county in which the property is located, to be entered upon the assessment rolls of the county and taxes computed and collected thereon subject to appeal under W.S. 39-14-609(b)(ii).”

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (b)(viii) deleted the former third sentence; in (c)(i), inserted “regarding severance tax,” and deleted “or board of county commissioners” following “the department” in the second sentence and added the third and fourth sentences; rewrote (c)(iii); and in (c)(iv), substituted “January 1, 2015” for “January 1, 1994” in four places, inserted “and ad valorem taxes determines to be due and owing as a result of an audit conducted under subsection (b) of this section” in the first sentence, substituted “delinquent severance taxes and ad valorem taxes shall” for “delinquent taxes shall” in the third sentence, and substituted “severance and ad valorem tax” for mineral tax” and as provided by the statutes in effect at the time the mineral was produced” for “eighteen percent (18%) per annum” in the fourth sentence.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, deleted “Commencing January 1, 2003” and made related changes in (b)(iii).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 50, § 3, provides that the lien created by the act is an equitable remedy created on behalf and in favor of the state and that it is available to the state in the collection of taxes, fees, penalties and interest.